Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-718
Refunding bonds; required statement.

Each new refunding bond so issued shall state therein (1) the object of its issue, (2) the section or sections of the law under which the issue thereof was made, including a statement that the issue is made in pursuance thereof, and (3) the date and principal amount of the bond or bonds for which the refunding bonds are being issued.

Laws 1879, § 2, p. 177;

R.S.1913, § 465;

C.S.1922, § 382;

C.S.1929, § 11-918;

R.S.1943, § 10-718;

Laws 1955, c. 16, § 2, p. 87;

Laws 1981, LB 313, § 2.